Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1104
Merger plan; city council; adopt resolution; advisory vote; notice.

(1) To enter into a merger plan, each city council of any two or more contiguous and adjacent cities shall adopt an initial joint concurrent resolution of intent to pursue such plan.

(2) If a resolution is adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the city councils of each city involved may hold an advisory vote at any general, primary, or special election if the advisory vote is presented to voters of all cities involved on the same day. Notice of the advisory vote to be voted on at a special election shall be given in the manner of notice for special elections in accordance with the Election Act. The result of the vote cast on a question submitted under this subsection shall not be binding upon such city councils.

Laws 2008, LB1056, § 4.

Election Act, see section 32-101.